District of Columbia statutes.
20-714

Revision of inventory.

Whether the administration is or is not supervised, any interested person may, at any time before the estate is closed, petition the Court for revision of any value assigned to any item in the inventory and for inclusion or exclusion of any item erroneously omitted or listed in the inventory. After due notice and hearing, the Court may require such revision as it deems appropriate.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(ll), 42 DCR 63
1981 Ed., § 20-714.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.